Maine, session 132, LD2069.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 1 MRSA §150-Z is enacted to read:
§150-Z. Maine Commercial Fishing Remembrance Day
July 21st of each year is designated as Maine Commercial Fishing Remembrance Day,
and the Governor shall annually issue a proclamation honoring and recognizing those
individuals who have lost their lives fishing for lobsters or scallops, digging clams or
actively participating in any other commercial fishery in the State.
Page 1 - 132LR2586(02)